test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NI_VV_makomii_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - VV - makomii :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     makomii: makomii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+makomii: nimakomii
     2+makomii: gimakomii
     3+makomii: omakomii
     X+makomii: imakomii
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     makomii+NI+Con: makomiinh
     makomii+NI+Dim: makomiins
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     makomii+NI+Pej: makomiish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     makomii+NI+Pret: makomiiban
     makomii+NI+VocPl: [makomiidig, makomiidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     makomii+NI+Loc: makomiing
     makomii+NI+Obv: makomiin
     makomii+NI+Pl: makomiin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+makomii+NI+Con: nimakomiinh
     1+makomii+NI+Dim: nimakomiins
     2+makomii+NI+Con: gimakomiinh
     2+makomii+NI+Dim: gimakomiins
     3+makomii+NI+Con: omakomiinh
     3+makomii+NI+Dim: omakomiins
     X+makomii+NI+Con: imakomiinh
     X+makomii+NI+Dim: imakomiins
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+makomii+NI+Pos: nimakomiim
     2+makomii+NI+Pos: gimakomiim
     3+makomii+NI+Pos: omakomiim
     X+makomii+NI+Pos: imakomiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+makomii+NI+Pej: nimakomiish
     2+makomii+NI+Pej: gimakomiish
     3+makomii+NI+Pej: omakomiish
     X+makomii+NI+Pej: imakomiish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+makomii+NI+1Pl: nimakomiinaan
     2+makomii+NI+21: gimakomiinaan
     2+makomii+NI+2Pl: gimakomiiwaa
     3+makomii+NI+3Obv: omakomiini
     3+makomii+NI+3Pl: omakomiiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+makomii+NI+Pret: nimakomiiban
     1+makomii+NI+VocPl: [nimakomiidig, nimakomiidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pret: gimakomiiban
     2+makomii+NI+VocPl: [gimakomiidig, gimakomiidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pret: omakomiiban
     3+makomii+NI+VocPl: [omakomiidig, omakomiidog]
     X+makomii+NI+Pret: imakomiiban
     X+makomii+NI+VocPl: [imakomiidig, imakomiidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Loc: nimakomiing
     1+makomii+NI+Obv: nimakomiin
     1+makomii+NI+Pl: nimakomiin
     2+makomii+NI+Loc: gimakomiing
     2+makomii+NI+Obv: gimakomiin
     2+makomii+NI+Pl: gimakomiin
     3+makomii+NI+Loc: omakomiing
     3+makomii+NI+Obv: omakomiin
     3+makomii+NI+Pl: omakomiin
     X+makomii+NI+Loc: imakomiing
     X+makomii+NI+Obv: imakomiin
     X+makomii+NI+Pl: imakomiin
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     makomii+NI+Con+Pej: makomiinyish
     makomii+NI+Dim+Pej: makomiinsish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     makomii+NI+Con+Pret: makomiinyiban
     makomii+NI+Con+VocPl: [makomiinyidig, makomiinyidog]
     makomii+NI+Dim+Pret: makomiinsiban
     makomii+NI+Dim+VocPl: [makomiinsidig, makomiinsidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     makomii+NI+Con+Loc: makomiinying
     makomii+NI+Con+Obv: makomiinyin
     makomii+NI+Con+Pl: makomiinyin
     makomii+NI+Dim+Loc: makomiinsing
     makomii+NI+Dim+Obv: makomiinsan
     makomii+NI+Dim+Pl: makomiinsan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     makomii+NI+Pej+Pret: makomiishiban
     makomii+NI+Pej+VocPl: [makomiishidig, makomiishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     makomii+NI+Pej+Loc: makomiishing
     makomii+NI+Pej+Obv: makomiishan
     makomii+NI+Pej+Pl: makomiishan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     makomii+NI+Pret+Loc: makomiibaniing
     makomii+NI+Pret+Obv: makomiibaniin
     makomii+NI+Pret+Pl: makomiibaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pos: nimakomiinyim
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos: nimakomiinsim
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pos: gimakomiinyim
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos: gimakomiinsim
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pos: omakomiinyim
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos: omakomiinsim
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Pos: imakomiinyim
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Pos: imakomiinsim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pej: nimakomiinyish
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pej: nimakomiinsish
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pej: gimakomiinyish
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pej: gimakomiinsish
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pej: omakomiinyish
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pej: omakomiinsish
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Pej: imakomiinyish
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Pej: imakomiinsish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+makomii+NI+Con+1Pl: nimakomiinyinaan
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+1Pl: nimakomiinsinaan
     2+makomii+NI+Con+21: gimakomiinyinaan
     2+makomii+NI+Con+2Pl: gimakomiinyiwaa
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+21: gimakomiinsinaan
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+2Pl: gimakomiinsiwaa
     3+makomii+NI+Con+3Obv: omakomiinyini
     3+makomii+NI+Con+3Pl: omakomiinyiwaa
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+3Obv: omakomiinsini
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+3Pl: omakomiinsiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pret: nimakomiinyiban
     1+makomii+NI+Con+VocPl: [nimakomiinyidig, nimakomiinyidog]
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pret: nimakomiinsiban
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+VocPl: [nimakomiinsidig, nimakomiinsidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pret: gimakomiinyiban
     2+makomii+NI+Con+VocPl: [gimakomiinyidig, gimakomiinyidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pret: gimakomiinsiban
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+VocPl: [gimakomiinsidig, gimakomiinsidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pret: omakomiinyiban
     3+makomii+NI+Con+VocPl: [omakomiinyidig, omakomiinyidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pret: omakomiinsiban
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+VocPl: [omakomiinsidig, omakomiinsidog]
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Pret: imakomiinyiban
     X+makomii+NI+Con+VocPl: [imakomiinyidig, imakomiinyidog]
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Pret: imakomiinsiban
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+VocPl: [imakomiinsidig, imakomiinsidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Loc: nimakomiinying
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Obv: nimakomiinyin
     1+makomii+NI+Con+Pl: nimakomiinyin
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Loc: nimakomiinsing
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Obv: nimakomiinsan
     1+makomii+NI+Dim+Pl: nimakomiinsan
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Loc: gimakomiinying
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Obv: gimakomiinyin
     2+makomii+NI+Con+Pl: gimakomiinyin
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Loc: gimakomiinsing
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Obv: gimakomiinsan
     2+makomii+NI+Dim+Pl: gimakomiinsan
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Loc: omakomiinying
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Obv: omakomiinyin
     3+makomii+NI+Con+Pl: omakomiinyin
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Loc: omakomiinsing
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Obv: omakomiinsan
     3+makomii+NI+Dim+Pl: omakomiinsan
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Loc: imakomiinying
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Obv: imakomiinyin
     X+makomii+NI+Con+Pl: imakomiinyin
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Loc: imakomiinsing
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Obv: imakomiinsan
     X+makomii+NI+Dim+Pl: imakomiinsan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej: nimakomiimish
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej: gimakomiimish
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej: omakomiimish
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Pej: imakomiimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+1Pl: nimakomiiminaan
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+21: gimakomiiminaan
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+2Pl: gimakomiimiwaa
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Obv: omakomiimini
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+3Pl: omakomiimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret: nimakomiimiban
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+VocPl: [nimakomiimidig, nimakomiimidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret: gimakomiimiban
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+VocPl: [gimakomiimidig, gimakomiimidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret: omakomiimiban
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+VocPl: [omakomiimidig, omakomiimidog]
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Pret: imakomiimiban
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+VocPl: [imakomiimidig, imakomiimidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Loc: nimakomiiming
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Obv: nimakomiiman
     1+makomii+NI+Pos+Pl: nimakomiiman
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Loc: gimakomiiming
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Obv: gimakomiiman
     2+makomii+NI+Pos+Pl: gimakomiiman
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Loc: omakomiiming
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Obv: omakomiiman
     3+makomii+NI+Pos+Pl: omakomiiman
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Loc: imakomiiming
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Obv: imakomiiman
     X+makomii+NI+Pos+Pl: imakomiiman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+1Pl: nimakomiishinaan
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+21: gimakomiishinaan
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+2Pl: gimakomiishiwaa
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Obv: omakomiishini
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+3Pl: omakomiishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret: nimakomiishiban
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+VocPl: [nimakomiishidig, nimakomiishidog]
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret: gimakomiishiban
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+VocPl: [gimakomiishidig, gimakomiishidog]
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret: omakomiishiban
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+VocPl: [omakomiishidig, omakomiishidog]
     X+makomii+NI+Pej+Pret: imakomiishiban
     X+makomii+NI+Pej+VocPl: [imakomiishidig, imakomiishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+Loc: nimakomiishing
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+Obv: nimakomiishan
     1+makomii+NI+Pej+Pl: nimakomiishan
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+Loc: gimakomiishing
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+Obv: gimakomiishan
     2+makomii+NI+Pej+Pl: gimakomiishan
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+Loc: omakomiishing
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+Obv: omakomiishan
     3+makomii+NI+Pej+Pl: omakomiishan
     X+makomii+NI+Pej+Loc: imakomiishing
     X+makomii+NI+Pej+Obv: imakomiishan
     X+makomii+NI+Pej+Pl: imakomiishan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+makomii+NI+1Pl+Pret: nimakomiinaaniban
     1+makomii+NI+1Pl+VocPl: [nimakomiinaanidig, nimakomiinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+21+Pret: gimakomiinaaniban
     2+makomii+NI+21+VocPl: [gimakomiinaanidig, gimakomiinaanidog]
     2+makomii+NI+2Pl+Pret: gimakomiiwaaban
     2+makomii+NI+2Pl+VocPl: [gimakomiiwaadig, gimakomiiwaadog]
     3+makomii+NI+3Obv+Pret: omakomiiniiban
     3+makomii+NI+3Obv+VocPl: [omakomiiniidig, omakomiiniidog]
     3+makomii+NI+3Pl+Pret: omakomiiwaaban
     3+makomii+NI+3Pl+VocPl: [omakomiiwaadig, omakomiiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+makomii+NI+1Pl+Loc: nimakomiinaaning
     1+makomii+NI+1Pl+Obv: nimakomiinaanin
     1+makomii+NI+1Pl+Pl: nimakomiinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+21+Loc: gimakomiinaaning
     2+makomii+NI+21+Obv: gimakomiinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+21+Pl: gimakomiinaanin
     2+makomii+NI+2Pl+Loc: gimakomiiwaang
     2+makomii+NI+2Pl+Obv: gimakomiiwaan
     2+makomii+NI+2Pl+Pl: gimakomiiwaan
     3+makomii+NI+3Obv+Loc: omakomiiniing
     3+makomii+NI+3Obv+Obv: omakomiiniin
     3+makomii+NI+3Obv+Pl: omakomiiniin
     3+makomii+NI+3Pl+Loc: omakomiiwaang
     3+makomii+NI+3Pl+Obv: omakomiiwaan
     3+makomii+NI+3Pl+Pl: omakomiiwaan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+makomii+NI+Pret+Loc: nimakomiibaniing
     1+makomii+NI+Pret+Obv: nimakomiibaniin
     1+makomii+NI+Pret+Pl: nimakomiibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pret+Loc: gimakomiibaniing
     2+makomii+NI+Pret+Obv: gimakomiibaniin
     2+makomii+NI+Pret+Pl: gimakomiibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pret+Loc: omakomiibaniing
     3+makomii+NI+Pret+Obv: omakomiibaniin
     3+makomii+NI+Pret+Pl: omakomiibaniin
     X+makomii+NI+Pret+Loc: imakomiibaniing
     X+makomii+NI+Pret+Obv: imakomiibaniin
     X+makomii+NI+Pret+Pl: imakomiibaniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6
     makomii+NI+Con+Pej+Pret: makomiinyishiban
     makomii+NI+Con+Pej+VocPl: [makomiinyishidig, makomiinyishidog]
     makomii+NI+Dim+Pej+Pret: makomiinsishiban
     makomii+NI+Dim+Pej+VocPl: [makomiinsishidig, makomiinsishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 7
     makomii+NI+Con+Pej+Loc: makomiinyishing
